Utah statutes.
11-6-1.   Records to be kept -- Availability to peace officers.
Pawnbrokers and dealers in secondhand goods shall keep records containing a
description of all articles received by them, the amounts paid therefor or
advanced thereon, a general description of the person from whom received,
together with his name and address and the date of the transaction. Such
records shall at all reasonable times be accessible to any peace officer who
demands an inspection thereof, and any further information regarding such
transaction that he may require shall be given by pawnbrokers and secondhand
dealers to the best of their ability. In cities of the first and the second
class at the close of each day's business pawnbrokers shall mail a copy of
such records to the sheriff of the county in which they are located.
